Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2691.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 524(a) of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 524. Data to be supplied by electric utilities.(a) General rule.--Effective December 31, 1987, each public utility producing, generating, distributing or furnishing electricity shall submit annually to the commission information concerning its future plans to meet its customer demand, including, but not limited to, the following data:* * *(8) An assessment of the utility's use of energy storage resources through appropriate modeling that accounts for 1234567891011121314151617 economic charge and discharge times and represents various economic scenarios.* * *(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Charge and discharge times." The time taken to charge energy storage resources with energy to be stored or discharge resources of energy to distribute that energy for use."Energy storage resources." Equipment and technology that is capable of absorbing energy, storing energy for a period of time and redelivering energy after it has been stored.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2691PN3774 - 2 - 12345678910111213